Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2270.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "specialty drug" and "spread pricing" in section 103 of the act of November 21, 2016 (P.L.1318, No.169), known as the Pharmacy Audit Integrity and Transparency Act, added July 17, 2024 (P.L.852, No.77), are amended to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Specialty drug." [Either of the following:(1) A prescription drug prescribed to a covered individual with a cost that meets or exceeds the cost of a drug on the specialty tier of Medicare Part D under 42 CFR 423.104(d)(2)(iv) (relating to requirements related to qualified prescription drug coverage) and meets three or more of the following criteria:(i) The drug requires specialized product handling or administration by the dispensing pharmacy.(ii) The drug requires specialized clinical care, including, but not limited to, frequent dosing adjustments to the prescription drug, clinical monitoring or expanded patient service, intensive patient counseling and ongoing clinical support, such as individualized disease or therapy management to support patient outcomes for a covered individual.(iii) The drug is prescribed for a covered individual with a rare medical condition, complex or chronic medical condition or life-threatening medical condition.(iv) The prescription drug has a limited or exclusive distribution and is not typically stocked or dispensed by a retail pharmacy.(2) A prescription drug that is prescribed to a covered individual and that is listed as a specialty drug on the medical assistance fee-for-service specialty pharmacy drug list.] Prescription medication used to treat complex or chronic conditions that requires special handling, provider coordination or patient education and monitoring for which a retail community pharmacy is not reasonably equipped to 20260HB2270PN3006 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 handle, store, provide counseling regarding use and safely distribute.* * *"Spread pricing." A model of prescription drug pricing in which the PBM charges a health benefit plan or health insurer a contracted price for prescription drugs and the contracted price for the prescription drugs [differs from] is more than the amount the PBM directly or indirectly pays the pharmacist or pharmacy for prescription drugs and related pharmacist services.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 605. State pharmacy benefits manager.(a) Duty of Department of Human Services .-- The Department of Human Services, by July 31, 2026, shall select and enter into a master contract with a single third-party administrator to serve as the State pharmacy benefits manager to administer all pharmacy benefits for Medicaid recipients, including those enrolled in a managed care organization by such date with whom the Department of Human Services contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services.(b) Requirement .-- Each managed care contract entered into or renewed by the Department of Human Services for the delivery of Medicaid services by a managed care organization shall require the managed care organization to contract with and utilize the State pharmacy benefits manager for the purpose of administering all pharmacy benefits for Medicaid recipients enrolled with the managed care organization.(c) Contractor compliance .--The State pharmacy benefits manager shall comply with the provisions of this act unless otherwise prohibited by Federal law.(d) Procurement process.--20260HB2270PN3006 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The Secretary of Human Services must, through a competitive procurement process that is in compliance with paragraph (2) , select a State pharmacy benefits manager to comply with subsection (e). (2) The competitive procurement process shall:(i) accept applications for entities seeking to become the State pharmacy benefits manager; and(ii) establish eligibility criteria that an entity must meet to become the State pharmacy benefits manager.(3) An applicant for the State pharmacy benefits manager must disclose to the Secretary of Human Services the following during the procurement process:(i) any activity, policy, practice, contract or arrangement of the applicant that may present a conflict of interest with performing as the State pharmacy benefits manager or a managed care organization;(ii) all common ownership, members of a board of directors, managers or other control of the applicant or any of the applicant's affiliated companies with:(A) a managed care organization administering medical assistance, Pennsylvania Medical Assistance program benefits in Pennsylvania or an affiliate of the managed care organization;(B) an entity that contracts on behalf of a pharmacy or any pharmacy services administration organization and its affiliates;(C) a drug wholesaler or distributor and its affiliates;(D) a third-party payer and its affiliates; or(E) a pharmacy and its affiliates;20260HB2270PN3006 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) any direct or indirect fees, charges or any kind of assessments imposed by the pharmacy benefits manager on pharmacies licensed in this Commonwealth with which the applicant shares common ownership, management or control or that are owned, managed or controlled by any of the applicant's affiliated companies; and(iv) any financial terms and arrangements between the applicant and a prescription drug manufacturer or labeler, including formulary management, drug substitution programs, educational support claims processing or data sales fees.(e) Contract requirements.--(1) The master contract shall prohibit the State pharmacy benefits manager from:(i) requiring, enticing or coercing an enrollee to obtain pharmacy services, including filling a prescription drug, from a pharmacy owned, specialty pharmacy owned or otherwise affiliated with the State pharmacy benefits manager;(ii) communicating to an enrollee that the enrollee is required to obtain a pharmacy service or have a prescription dispensed at, or pharmacy services provided by, a particular pharmacy owned by or affiliated with the State pharmacy benefits manager if there are other nonaffiliated pharmacies in network that have the ability to dispense medication or provide services;(iii) requiring an enrollee to obtain pharmacy services, including filling a prescription drug, exclusively through a mail order pharmacy;(iv) requiring an enrollee to obtain pharmacy 20260HB2270PN3006 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 services, including filling a prescription drug, exclusively through a mail order pharmacy or specialty pharmacy unless the service or drug can only reasonably be performed or dispensed at a specialty pharmacy;(v) requiring a pharmacy to maintain or provide documentation that differs from requirements based on Federal or State law or State Board of Pharmacy regulations to demonstrate that a prescription is valid and intended to treat an enrollee's underlying condition;(vi) directly or indirectly retroactively denying or reducing a claim or aggregate of claims:(A) for prescription drugs when the prescription is facially valid and consistent with Federal or State law or State B oard of Pharmacy regulations; or (B) for pharmacy services, including prescription drugs, after adjudication of the claim or aggregation of claims;(vii) engaging in the use of spread pricing; and(viii) charging or recouping direct or indirect remuneration fees, multiple network reconciliation offsets, adjudication transaction fees or other fees to a pharmacy.(2) The master contract required under subsection (a) shall include provisions that require the State pharmacy benefits manager to:(i) pay a rate for pharmacy services, including filling a prescription drug, that is no less than the National Average Drug Acquisition Cost guidelines for the prescription drug or, if the National Average Drug Acquisition Cost guidelines are unavailable, the 20260HB2270PN3006 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 wholesale acquisition cost, plus the professional dispensing fee, as defined in 42 CFR 447.502 (relating to definitions), for outpatient drugs by pharmacies in the Medicaid program. The professional dispensing fee shall be set at 100% of the Medicaid fee-for-service dispensing fee determined in accordance with an in-State cost-of-dispensing survey conducted no more than every three years;(ii) establish the State pharmacy benefits manager's fiduciary duty owed to the Department of Human Services as well as any pharmacy or pharmacist who provides pharmacy services to an enrollee; and(iii) require the use of pass-through pricing.(f) Definitions.- -As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Pass-through pricing." The model of prescription drug pricing wherein a pharmacy benefits manager charges the health benefit plan the same price for a prescription drug that it pays the pharmacy for the same prescription drug."State pharmacy benefits manager." The pharmacy benefits manager contracted by the Department of Human Services pursuant to the procurement process provided in subsection (d) to administer pharmacy benefits for all Medicaid recipients in this Commonwealth.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2270PN3006 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526